Wyoming, session 2025, HB0312.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-3-103.1 is created to read:

16-3-103.1. Regulatory review office; duties; powers;
cost-benefit analysis required; sunset of rules.

HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658
(a) The regulatory review office is hereby created
within the office of the governor. The administrative head
of the office shall be a director, who shall be appointed
by the governor. Subject to available funding, the director
may employ qualified persons to assist in the
implementation of the duties and powers of the office. The
governor shall include in the budget submitted for the
office of the governor a budget for the regulatory review
office.

(b) The regulatory review office shall:

(i) Review each rule formulated or adopted by
each agency to:

(A) Ensure compliance with this act and the
procedures associated with promulgating rules under this
act;

(B) Ensure and maintain consistency among
rules promulgated by all agencies;

HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658
(C) Complete the cost-benefit analysis
required under this section.

(ii) Oversee the development of all annual
regulatory plans submitted in accordance with subsection
(c) of this section and review the completed annual
regulatory plans;

(iii) Conduct cost-benefit analyses of each rule
in accordance with subsection (d) of this section;

(iv) Coordinate with the governor, the
governor's designee and the attorney general in the
promulgation of rules under this act;

(v) Coordinate with each agency to streamline
all current rulemaking processes across all agencies,
including the promulgation of rules in accordance with this
act;

(vi) If requested by an agency, provide
technical assistance with the promulgation of rules under
this act;
HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658

(vii) Not less than one (1) time every five (5)
years, conduct a systematic review of all rules promulgated
by each agency to:

(A) Ensure consistency and, where possible,
uniformity among all agency rules;

(B) Determine whether changes in rules are
necessary in light of current law;

(C) Determine whether any rules should be
recommended for repeal or sunset because the rules are
outdated, burdensome, obsolete or otherwise are not in
accordance with law or current standards for rules.

(viii) Not later than November 1 of each year,
report to the governor, the attorney general and the
management council of the legislature on:

(A) The activities of the office;

HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658
(B) A general summary of the cost-benefit
analyses conducted under this section for the immediately
preceding fiscal year, including noting any rule for which
a cost-benefit analysis estimated an economic impact of not
less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) in
Wyoming;

(C) Any rules identified in the immediately
preceding fiscal year that the office recommended for
repeal or sunset because the rules are outdated,
burdensome, obsolete or otherwise are not in accordance
with law or current standards for rules;

(D) Any recommendations for changes to the
act.

(c) Not later than July 1 of each year, each agency
shall develop and submit an annual regulatory plan for
rulemaking for the fiscal year. The plan shall:

(i) Include a list of all anticipated
rulemakings for the fiscal year;

HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658
(ii) Describe steps that will be taken during
the fiscal year to streamline the agency's rules, review
for the potential repeal of the agency's rules that are
burdensome or obsolete and ensure that the agency's rules
are consistent with the rules of all other agencies;

(iii) Submit the report to the regulatory review
office;

(iv) Post the report in a conspicuous location
on the agency's main website home page.

(d) Before adopting, amending or repealing any rule,
and subject to subsection (e) of this section, the agency
shall complete or cause to have completed a cost-benefit
analysis of the rule. The analysis shall either be included
in the initial notice given under W.S. 16-3-103(a)(i) or
shall be separately provided through notice not later than
thirty (30) days after notice for the rule is given under
W.S. 16-3-103(a)(i). The agency shall also publish the
cost-benefit analysis on its website. The analysis required
under this subsection shall evaluate, at a minimum:

HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658
(i) The need for the rule. The agency
promulgating the rule shall provide, as part of the
analysis under this subsection, a statement of need for the
rule;

(ii) An examination of alternatives to the
enactment of the rule;

(iii) The costs and benefits for the rule,
including:

(A) Estimated primary or direct benefits
accruing as a result of the rule;

(B) Estimated cost savings or financial
benefits to the state and its residents and businesses;

(C) Estimated compliance costs for
regulated entities subject to the rule, including secondary
or indirect costs associated with the rule;

(D) Estimated effect on state revenue;

HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658
(E) Estimated effect on state expenditures,
including estimated administrative expenses;

(F) Estimated opportunity costs. For
purposes of this subparagraph, the cost of compliance in
terms of any resulting removal of private capital from the
market shall be included in the analysis;

(G) The sources consulted to complete the
analysis;

(H) Key assumptions made and sources of
uncertainty with the analysis;

(J) Any other information the agency
determines would be beneficial for consideration of the
rule.

(e) A cost-benefit analysis required under subsection
(d) of this section shall not be required for emergency
rules promulgated under W.S. 16-3-103(b), provided that the
governor, following review by the regulatory review office,
HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658
finds that an emergency exists necessitating the
promulgation of an emergency rule.

(f) The regulatory review office shall promulgate all
rules necessary to implement this section. Rules
promulgated under the authority granted in this subsection
shall not require the completion of a cost-benefit analysis
before final adoption of the rules.

Section 2. W.S. 16-3-102(a) by creating a new
paragraph (iv), (b) and (c) and 16-3-103(a)(i) by creating
a new subparagraph (M), (ii) by creating a new subparagraph
(D) and by renumbering (D) as (E) are amended to read:

16-3-102. General rulemaking requirements; assistance
and authority of attorney general.

(a) In addition to other rulemaking requirements
imposed by law, each agency shall:

(iv) Complete an annual regulatory plan in
accordance with W.S. 16-3-103.1(c).

HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658
(b) No agency rule, order or decision is valid or
effective against any person or party, nor may it be
invoked by the agency for any purpose, until it has been
filed with the registrar of rules and made available for
public inspection as required by this act and until a
cost-benefit analysis has been completed as required by
W.S. 16-3-103.1(d). This subsection does not apply to
orders or decisions in favor of any person or party with
actual knowledge of the rule, order or decision.

(c) In formulating rules of practice as required by
this section, each agency may request the assistance of the
attorney general or the regulatory review office, and upon
request, the attorney general and the regulatory review
office shall assist the agency or agencies in the
preparation of rules of practice.

16-3-103. Adoption, amendment and repeal of rules;
notice; hearing; emergency rules; proceedings to contest;
review and approval by governor.

HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658
(a) Prior to an agency's adoption, amendment or
repeal of all rules other than interpretative rules or
statements of general policy, the agency shall:

(i) Give at least forty-five (45) days notice of
its intended action. Notice shall be mailed to all persons
making timely requests of the agency for advanced notice of
its rulemaking proceedings and to the attorney general, the
secretary of state's office as registrar of rules, and the
legislative service office if a state agency. The agency
shall submit a copy of the proposed rules, in a format
conforming to any requirements prescribed pursuant to
subsection (f) of this section, with the notice given to
the legislative service office. The notice shall include:

(M) The cost-benefit analysis for the rule
required under W.S. 16-3-103.1(d) or, if the analysis is
incomplete when notice is provided under this paragraph,
the date by which the cost-benefit analysis will be
completed and posted on the agency's website.

(ii) Afford all interested persons reasonable
opportunity to submit data, views or arguments, orally or
HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658
in writing, provided this period shall consist of at least
forty-five (45) days from the later of the dates specified
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, and provided:

(D) If, before final adoption, any person
objects to the accuracy of a statement made by the agency
in the cost-benefit analysis prepared under W.S.
16-3-103.1(d), the agency shall include with the final
rules submitted for review to the governor and the
legislative service office a concise statement of the
objection and the agency's response;

(D)(E) Upon adoption of the rule, the
agency, if requested to do so by an interested person,
either prior to adoption or within thirty (30) days
thereafter, shall issue a concise statement of the
principal reasons for overruling the consideration urged
against its adoption.

Section 3. There is authorized three (3) full-time
equivalent positions for the office of the governor for the
regulatory review office created in section 1 of this act
beginning on the effective date of this section through
HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658
June 30, 2026. It is the intent of the legislature that
these three (3) full-time equivalent positions be included
in the standard budget of the office of the governor for
the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 4. There is appropriated four hundred
thousand dollars ($400,000.00) from the general fund to the
office of the governor for purposes of funding the three
(3) positions for the regulatory review office authorized
in section 3 of this act. This appropriation shall be for
the period beginning with the effective date of this
section and ending June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall
not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and
any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included and doubled in the standard
budget of the office of the governor for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 5. This act shall apply to all rules for
which notice is provided under W.S. 16-3-103(a)(i) on and
after July 1, 2025.
HB0312

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0658

Section 6. The office of the governor may take any
action necessary to implement this act by July 1, 2025.

Section 7.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3, 4, 6 and 7 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0312